District of Columbia statutes.
16-578

Superior Court judgments; lapse; validity.

An attachment issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia upon a judgment of that court duly filed and recorded, and levied within twelve years from the date of the judgment upon the wages due or to become due to the judgment debtor from the employer-garnishee, shall not lapse or become invalid prior to complete satisfaction solely by reason of the expiration of the period of limitation set forth in section 15-101 .

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 555, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(b)(3)(A), (b)(4)
1981 Ed., § 16-578.
1973 Ed., § 16-578.